Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB539.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 446 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, the term "foreign law, legal code, or system" means any
law, legal code, or system of a jurisdiction outside of any state or territory of the
United States, including international organizations and tribunals.
(2) (a) A ruling or decision of a court, arbitration panel, tribunal, or administrative
agency which is based, in whole or in part, on Sharia or any foreign law,
legal code, or system; or
(b) A contract, or contractual provision if severable, which:
1. Provides for the choice of Sharia or any foreign law, legal code, or
system; or
2. Grants jurisdiction to a foreign tribunal;
is void and unenforceable if the ruling, decision, contract, or contractual
provision allows the application of Sharia or any foreign law, legal code, or
system that denies the parties the fundamental liberties, rights, and privileges
guaranteed under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of
Kentucky.
(3) This section shall not:
(a) Disapprove or abrogate existing precedent of the Supreme Court of
Kentucky;
(b) Limit adjudication of ecclesiastical matters of a religious organization,
including the selection, appointment, discipline, or removal of clergy or
interpretation of doctrine;
(c) Apply to corporations, partnerships, or associations that voluntarily subject
themselves to foreign law or courts; or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1084
(d) Apply where federal law preempts state law, including obligations under
treaties or international agreements.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/12/2026 10:47 AM Jacketed